Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 2. Expenses of Care, Treatment or Training, and Maintenance.

§ 37.2-715.
Who liable for expenses; amount.

Any person who has been or who may be admitted to any state facility or who is the subject of counseling or receives treatment from the staff of a state facility shall be deemed to be an individual receiving services for the purposes of this article.

The income and estate of an individual receiving services shall be liable for the expenses of his care, treatment or training, and maintenance in a state facility. Any person responsible for holding, managing, or controlling the income and estate of the individual receiving services shall apply the income and estate toward the expenses of the individual’s care, treatment or training, and maintenance.

Any person responsible for the support of an individual receiving services pursuant to §

20-61

shall be liable for the expenses of his care, treatment or training, and maintenance in a state facility. Any such person shall no longer be financially liable, however, when a cumulative total of 1,826 days of (i) care and treatment or training for the individual in a state facility, (ii) utilization by the individual of services or facilities under the jurisdiction or supervision of any community services board or behavioral health authority, or (iii) a combination of (i) and (ii) has passed and payment for or a written agreement to pay the charges for 1,826 days of care and services has been made. Not less than three hours of service per day shall be required to include one day in the cumulative total of 1,826 days of utilization of services under the jurisdiction or supervision of a community services board or behavioral health authority. In order to claim this exemption, the person legally liable for the individual shall produce evidence sufficient to prove eligibility for it.

Such expenses shall not exceed the average cost for the particular type of service rendered and shall be determined no less frequently than annually by the Department in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to the health care industry. In no event shall recovery be permitted for amounts more than five years past due. A certificate of the Commissioner or his designee shall be prima facie evidence of the actual charges for the particular type of service rendered.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125.1; 1950, p. 917; 1952, c. 492; 1956, c. 493; 1960, c. 386; 1962, c. 80; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-105; 1972, c. 342; 1974, c. 667; 1982, c. 50; 1988, c. 713; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer,” “individual” for “consumer,” and “individual’s” for “consumer’s” throughout the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, §§ 4, 15, 31.

§ 37.2-716.
Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Revenue Fund.

All funds collected by the Department pursuant to this article shall be paid into a special fund of the state treasury that shall be known and referred to as the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Revenue Fund.

This fund shall be appropriated and used for the operation of the Department and its state facilities for research and training. Unexpended funds in the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Revenue Fund at the close of any fiscal year shall be retained in the fund and be available for expenditure in ensuing years as provided herein.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125.2; 1950, p. 917; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-106; 1970, c. 758; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 813 and 840, cl. 4 provides: “That, as of the effective date of this act, the Behavioral Health and Developmental Trust and Revenue Funds created pursuant to §

37.2-716

of the Code of Virginia shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Trust and Revenue Funds.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” twice.

§ 37.2-717.
Department to investigate financial ability to pay expenses; assessments and contracts by Department.

The Department shall investigate and determine which individuals receiving services or parents, guardians, conservators, trustees, or other persons legally responsible for individuals receiving services are financially able to pay the expenses of the care, treatment or training, and maintenance, and the Department shall notify these individuals or their parents, guardians, conservators, trustees, or other legally responsible persons of the expenses of care, treatment or training, and maintenance and, in general, of the provisions of this article.

The Department may assess or contract with any individual receiving services or the parent, guardian, conservator, trustee, or other person liable for his support and maintenance to recover care, treatment or training, and maintenance expenses. In arriving at the amount to be paid, the Department shall have due regard for the financial condition and estate of the individual, his present and future needs, and the present and future needs of his lawful dependents. Whenever it is deemed necessary to protect him or his dependents, the Department may assess or agree to accept a monthly sum for the individual’s care, treatment or training, and maintenance that is less than the actual per diem cost, provided that the estate of the individual other than income shall not be depleted below the sum of $500. Nothing contained in this title shall be construed as making any such contract permanently binding upon the Department or prohibiting it from periodically reevaluating the actual per diem cost of care, treatment or training, and maintenance and the financial condition and estate of any individual receiving services, his present and future needs, and the present and future needs of his lawful dependents and entering into a new agreement with the individual or the parent, guardian, conservator, trustee, or other person liable for his support and maintenance, increasing or decreasing the sum to be paid for the individual’s care, treatment or training, and maintenance.

All contracts made by and between the Department and any person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any individual receiving services adjudicated to be incapacitated under the provisions of Article 1 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Chapter 20 of Title 64.2 and all assessments made by the Department upon that individual or his fiduciaries, providing for payment of the expenses of such individual in any state facility, shall be subject to the approval of any circuit court having jurisdiction over the incapacitated individual’s estate or for the county or city in which he resides or from which he was admitted to the state facility.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-125.4, 37-125.5; 1950, p. 917; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 14; 1960, c. 386; 1962, c. 80; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-108, 37.1-109; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 257; 1976, c. 671; 1997, cc. 801, 921; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Article 1 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) of Chapter 10” was changed to “Article 1 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Chapter 20 of Title 64.2” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers,” “individual” for “consumer,” and “individual’s” for “consumer’s” throughout the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 10; 10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.

§ 37.2-718.
Order to compel payment of expenses.

When any individual receiving services or his guardian, conservator, trustee, or other person liable for his expenses fails to pay those expenses and it appears from investigation that the individual, his guardian, conservator, trustee, or other person liable for his support is able or has sufficient estate to pay the expenses, the Department shall petition the appropriate court having jurisdiction over the estate of the individual or the court for the county or city in which the individual resides or from which he was admitted to a state facility for an order to compel payment of the expenses by the person liable therefor. In any case in which a person liable for the support of the individual is being proceeded against, the petition shall be directed to the appropriate court of the county or city in which the person liable for the support of the individual resides.

The individual receiving services and his estate shall first be liable for the payment of his expenses and thereafter, the person liable for the support of the individual. Such person shall be the father, mother, husband, wife, or child of the individual who has attained the age of majority. Multiple persons shall be jointly and severally liable. The Department shall collect part or all of the expenses from the several sources as appears proper under the circumstances and may proceed against all sources, except that the principal or income or both from a trust created for the benefit of the individual shall be liable for payment only as provided in Article 5 (§

64.2-742

et seq.) of the Uniform Trust Code. In evaluating the circumstances, the Department may consider any events related to the admission of the individual for treatment or training that have affected the person liable, such as the infliction of serious injury by the individual on the person who is liable. The proceedings for the collection of expenses shall conform to the procedure for collection of debts due the Commonwealth.

Notice of any hearing on the petition of the Department for an order to compel payment of expenses shall be served at least 15 days prior to the hearing and in the manner provided for the service of civil process on the individual receiving services and, if there is one, on his guardian, conservator, or trustee, on the other person legally responsible for the individual’s support, or on the person against whom the proceedings are instituted.

At the hearing, the court shall hear the allegations and proofs of the parties and shall by order require full or partial payment of maintenance by the liable parties, if they have sufficient ability, having due regard for the financial condition and estate of the individual receiving services or any other person liable for his expenses, his present and future needs, and the present and future needs of his lawful dependents, if the proceeding is to charge the individual or any other person liable with such expenses.

Upon application of any interested party and upon like notice and procedure, the court may at any time modify an order to compel payment of expenses. If the application is made by any party other than the Department, the notice shall be served on the Commissioner.

Any party aggrieved by an order or by the judgment of the court may appeal therefrom in the manner provided by law.

Any order or judgment rendered by the court hereunder shall have the same force and effect and shall be enforceable in the same manner and form as any judgment recovered in favor of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-125.6, 37-125.8 to 37-125.12; 1950, p. 918; 1962, c. 80; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-110 to 37.1-115; 1972, cc. 382, 590; 1976, c. 671; 1978, c. 482; 1979, c. 669; 1982, c. 50; 1987, c. 137; 1990, c. 927; 1997, c. 801; 2005, cc. 716, 935; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 935, effective July 1, 2006, amended former § 37.1-110, from which this section was derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 935 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendment by c. 935 substituted “Article 5 (§ 55-545.01 et seq.) of the Uniform Trust Code” for “§ 55-19” in the fourth sentence of subsection B.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Article 5 (§ 55-545.01 et seq.) of the Uniform Trust Code” was changed to “Article 5 (§

64.2-742

et seq.) of the Uniform Trust Code” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual receiving services” for “consumer” near the beginning of the first sentences of subsections A and B, and in subsection D; substituted “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section; and “individual’s” for “consumer’s” near the end of subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.

§ 37.2-719.
Statement forms to be completed by the person liable for support of an individual receiving services.

The Commissioner may prescribe statement forms that shall be completed by those persons liable under §

37.2-715

for the support of the individual receiving services. The statement shall be sworn to by the person and returned to the Commissioner within 30 days from the time the statement was mailed to the person. Should the person fail to return the properly completed statement to the Commissioner within 30 days, the Commissioner shall send another statement by registered mail. If the statement is not then returned properly completed within 30 days, the person to whom it was sent by registered mail shall be assessed $5 for each week or part of each week in excess of the 30-day period that the statement is overdue. The Department shall collect these assessments in the same manner as other sums due for the care, treatment or training, and maintenance of individuals receiving services from the persons whose duty it was to complete each statement. When collected, these assessments shall be paid into the same fund into which other collections are paid under this article.

A statement of liability imposed by this section shall be placed in a prominent place, in boldface type, upon each statement form.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125.15; 1952, c. 492; 1956, c. 493; 1958, c. 472; 1962, c. 80; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-118; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual receiving services” for “consumer” at the end of the first sentence and “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” near the middle of the fifth sentence.

§ 37.2-720.
When collection of expenses not required.

This article shall not be held or construed to require the Department to collect the expenses of the care, treatment or training, and maintenance of any indigent individual receiving services from that individual or from any person liable for him when investigation discloses that the indigent individual or person liable for his support is without financial means or that such payment would work a hardship on the individual or his family. Neither shall it be the duty or obligation of the Department to institute any proceedings provided for in this article to effect collection where investigation discloses that proceedings would be without effect or would work a hardship on the individual receiving services or the person liable for his support.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125.13; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-116; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual receiving services” for “consumer,” “individual” for “person” and “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in health care law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2002).

§ 37.2-721.
Liability of estate of the individual receiving services.

Upon the death of any individual who is receiving or who has received services, his estate shall be liable only for the charges remaining unpaid and not more than five years past due and the unsatisfied portion of any judgment rendered by a court in a proceeding under this article. Upon the death of any individual who is receiving or who has received services, the provisions of §

37.2-717

, which prohibit depleting the individual’s estate below $500, shall after funeral expenses have no further application, and such sum may be applied to the charges of the Department remaining unpaid or may be applied to the unsatisfied portion of any judgment.

Upon the death of any individual who is receiving or who has received services in the event amounts remain unpaid for his care, treatment or training, and maintenance, the Department, having reason to believe that the individual died possessed of real or personal property from which reimbursement may be had, shall prepare and acknowledge, as deeds are acknowledged, a notice showing the name of the individual and the actual per diem cost of maintenance due and shall file the notice within four months of the date of the individual’s death in the office of the clerk of the court in which deeds are admitted to record in the county or city in which the real or personal property is located. The clerk of court shall record this notice as a lien is recorded, indexing it in the names of the individual and the Department. The filing of this notice shall create a lien against the estate, both real and personal, of the deceased individual prior to all other claims of the same class except prior liens. No such claim shall be enforced against any real estate of the deceased individual while such real estate is occupied by the surviving spouse of the individual or while such real estate is occupied by any dependent child of the individual.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125.14; 1952, c. 492; 1954, c. 445; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-117; 1972, c. 383; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual who is receiving or who has received services” for “consumer or former consumer,” “individual’s” for “consumer’s” and “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section.